Privacy Notice
Last updated: March 2025
This privacy notice tells you what to expect when Medtronic collects information about you ("personal data") in connection with the activities described below, including when you set up a Touch Surgery™ account, and when you visit Touch Surgery™ websites or mobile applications.
Unless set out otherwise below, the Medtronic company responsible for processing your personal data is Digital Surgery Limited, with an address at 230 City Road, EC1V 2QY, London, UK, or the Medtronic company that you interact with (together, "Medtronic", "we" or "us").
In this privacy notice, we'll tell you what personal data we collect about you, how we use that information, with whom we share it, what rights you have regarding your information, and how to contact us to exercise these rights.
This privacy notice does not apply when you have been notified that an alternative notice applies (for example on other Medtronic websites) or where Medtronic processes patient personal data on behalf of medical institutions in connection with medical treatment.
Personal Data We Collect and How We Use It
This section explains, for each situation, what personal data we may collect, how we use that information, and what is our lawful basis for doing so. Click on the links below to learn more.
Touch Surgery™ account creation and management
Using Our Services
Contacting Our Customer and Support Services
Participating in Our Events, Interviews or Surveys
Interacting on Social Media with or about Medtronic
Marketing
Ensuring Compliance and Defending Legal Rights
Touch Surgery™ account creation and management
You may wish to create an online Touch Surgery™ account to access services we offer as part of the Touch Surgery™ ecosystem.
What personal data we collect
When you create a Touch Surgery™ account, the types of personal data we collect or process about you include:
Identification information, such as your name, email address, postal address, phone number, user ID number, date of birth or age, and profile picture (optional);
Location data, such as your country/region and language preference;
Professional details, such as your profession, your job title and your medical specialty, interests, evidence of your position as a clinician, registration number (e.g. GMC number), license information, the name of the institution you work for and your professional email address.
Login credentials, such as your username/email address and password. If you opt to use a third-party login service (such as Google, Apple or Doximity), we will obtain from your chosen third-party login service certain minimal information including: your name, email address, profile picture and other information that you elect to provide to us, or as configured by the third-party login service. Please review the privacy notice of the particular third-party login service for more information on how they use and share your data.
How we use your data
We will use your data in order to create and manage your account, including to authenticate you, ensure account security, and, where applicable, to confirm your status as a clinical professional to ensure access to our products and services is by the professionals they are intended for. We will do so based on a contractual relationship we have with you or to take pre-contractual steps at your request, or otherwise based on our legitimate interests to manage customer relationships and ensure the security of TouchSurgery™ accounts.
We may further use your account information, together with the information collected through our products or services, to communicate with you and provide you with the products and services you requested, unless you have been notified that an alternative notice applies to such use.
Using Our Services
When you access the TouchSurgery™ ecosystem services, we may collect and use your personal data to provide and improve such services.
What personal data we collect
We collect certain information regarding your use of our services that is associated with your Touch Surgery™ account. This information may include traffic and usage data that is used for purposes of troubleshooting, testing, system maintenance, and support, and information about your geography to ensure you can access relevant content, based on where you are. We may also collect certain information to provide and improve the services. For example, when you access simulations or the video library on the Touch Surgery™ ecosystem, we will collect data analytics and insights based on your actions, reports generated and activities when using our services. When you use our Live Stream connectivity platform we may collect aggregate level data on usage and metrics for billing and quality management purposes. We may also use information from reporting or dashboard functionality (e.g. post-operative insights) to provide you with tailored learning pathways and to further improve our services. If you choose to submit videos to our video library for purposes of sharing best practice with other users, we may use your name, credentials and other relevant information about you associated with such video, to attribute the video to you. Your personal data (such as your credentials, contact information and/or preferences) will also be made available across the Touch Surgery™ ecosystem services you use, in order to facilitate and personalize your customer journey with Medtronic, where relevant.
How we use your data
We will use your data as needed to fulfill our contract to provide you with services and based on our legitimate interests to optimize our services, including by providing you with a tailored learning pathway and relevant information about our products and services, and supporting you in analyzing your performance data.
If you're a patient, your medical institution (i.e. treating hospital or clinic) is responsible for deciding how they use Touch Surgery™ products and services to process your information (such as when a surgical video is linked to your patient record). In such instance, we will use this information on behalf of your medical institution in order to provide the services they request and your data is subject to your medical institution's own data policies and privacy notice. You may contact them directly for further information in this regard.
In certain circumstances, Medtronic may further use data obtained as part of the services provided to your medical institution, with their authorization, in a de-identified, aggregated or otherwise anonymized manner. For more information on such secondary use of data by Medtronic, please see the relevant section of your country's privacy notice on
medtronic.com
.
Visiting our Websites and Apps
When you visit our websites or apps, we may collect certain information by automated means, including cookies and similar technologies, such as Flash cookies, local storage, web beacons and pixels, JavaScript, software development kits (SDKs) and device identifiers.
What personal data we collect
The information collected in this manner may include your device IP address, domain name, identifiers associated with your devices, device and operating system type and characteristics, web browser characteristics, language preferences, your interactions with our site or app (such as the pages you visit, links you click and features you use, dates and times of access to our site/app, the pages that led or referred you to our site), and other information about your use of our site or app.
How we use your data
Cookies and similar technologies ("Cookies") are used by us for several reasons. Cookies are sometimes necessary for our sites or apps to operate correctly and secure log-ins to work properly. Cookies allow us to count the visitors to our sites/apps and learn how they use our sites/apps and their features, enabling us to continually improve the visitor's experience. Cookies may also allow us to provide you with enhanced features, such as video content and chat functionality, and show you targeted ads on other sites or social media channels. Depending on your location, some Cookies may require your consent.  Click
here
to know more about our use of Cookies and how to manage your Cookie settings and preferences.
Contacting Our Customer and Support Services
You may make an inquiry, require assistance or support by contacting our customer service or support team by phone, email or other available customer support tools.
What personal data we collect
If you contact our customer and support services to make an inquiry or request support, the types of personal data we collect or process about you include:
Identification and contact information, such as your name, title, email address, telephone number, address (as relevant);
Location data, such as country/region;
Information about you that you submit in your request;
Any other information about you necessary for dealing with your request;
Audio recordings and notes if we record the conversation we have with you;
How we use your data
We will use your data to respond to you, provide you with required support, and follow up on your request, including, where applicable, ensuring compliance with our regulatory obligations and establishing, exercising or defending ourselves from legal claims. We may also keep a record of the communications we have with you for evidentiary purposes and to train our personnel and improve the quality of our services. If you call us, you will be notified at the beginning of the call whether our conversation will be recorded.
We will use your data for the above reasons based on the following bases:
Our need to perform the contract we may have with you, or to take pre-contractual steps at your request;
Our legitimate interests, in particular in handling your request, training our personnel, improving our services to you and defending our legal rights; or
Our need to comply with our legal obligations.
Please note that, in some circumstances, we may use your data to provide technical support on behalf of and in the name of your medical institution or healthcare professional. This is the case if the Medtronic product or service you use was provided to your medical institution or healthcare professional, as part of the services Medtronic provides to them. If that product or service requires technical support, we'll use your data as directed by your medical institution and/or healthcare professional, as part of your medical treatment. Please contact your medical institution or healthcare professional to learn more on their use of your data for the provision of medical treatment or care.
Participating in Our Events, Interviews or Surveys
You may wish to participate in one of our events (such as workshops, meetings, webinars or live broadcast events). Such events may be physical in-person, or virtual (such as when we organize a virtual event via our Live Stream functionality). We may ask you to share your story, provide testimonial or take part in an interview about your experience with a Medtronic product. In this case, we'll need to process some personal data about you, as described below.
If you're a healthcare professional attending our events or receiving or benefitting from Medtronic consultancy, training and education services, or if you provide such services to us, please read the Medtronic
Privacy Notice for Education Services
to learn more on the use of your data in relation to those services.
Events or Interviews
You may attend another type of event or provide a testimonial or take part in an interview about your experience with a Medtronic product.
What personal data we collect
If you participate in one of our events, testimonials or interviews, the types of personal data we collect or process about you include:
Identification/contact information, such as your name (or a fictitiousname to protect your privacy), email address, nationality, country;
Personal details, such as dietary requirements, where applicable;
Professional information, such as your job type, title;
Product/service of interest to you, where applicable;
Images, video and/or audio recordings of you, if our event/interview is filmed or recorded.
How we use your data
We will use your data to organize and facilitate the event/interview, and conduct Medtronic's educational, promotional and advertising activities. We will do so with your (explicit) consent, where required by applicable law (e.g., if the event is recorded and/or we collect sensitive information such as your health data), or as otherwise necessary for the purposes of Medtronic's legitimate interests in promoting and supporting Medtronic activities.
The Medtronic entity responsible for processing your data for the above purposes is the Medtronic affiliate organizing the event/interview (in practice, the Medtronic business entity of the country where the event takes place).
Surveys
From time to time, we may invite you to participate in a Medtronic survey to gather your feedback to help us determine customer satisfaction levels, identify areas of potential improvement or to carry out market research.
The Medtronic entity responsible for the processing of your personal data for the above purposes is the Medtronic entity that sends you the survey, or the entity indicated in the survey questionnaire or notice provided to you at the time of data collection.
What personal data we collect
To the extent possible, we will gather your feedback in an anonymous manner. In some cases however, the survey may gather identifiable respondent information. In such instance, the types of the personal data we collect or process about you include:
Identification/contact information, such as your name, email address, phone number;
Professional details (if you are a business customer), such as your employer's details, specialty, professional experience, professional qualifications;
Opinions, views or information you choose to provide us as part of your survey responses.  ;
Where applicable, information collected by automated means (including cookies), such as your IP address, and survey metadata (e.g., the language you take the survey in, duration of your survey response, last date the survey was started).
How we use your data
We will use your personal data to conduct the survey, including to send it to you, allow you to submit your survey responses, prevent survey fraud, analyze the survey results, and improve or develop our products and services accordingly, based on our legitimate interests to do so or with your consent, where required by applicable law.
Interacting on Social Media with or about Medtronic
You may send us a private or direct message via social media, or you may communicate about us or Medtronic products on social media (e.g., if you participate in our online communities, share a comment about a Medtronic product or if you tag Medtronic in your post).
What personal data we collect
If you interact on social media with or about us, the types of personal data we collect or process about you include:
Social media information, such as your social media username, profile picture, country;
Any information about you that is contained in your comments, posts or other content about Medtronic that you share on social media services.
How we use your data
We will use your data to review or respond to your message or comments, and where applicable, to provide you with the required support and take any necessary follow-up actions.  If you communicate about us or our products, we will also use your data to gain a general understanding of what people are saying about us and our products. We'll do so based on our legitimate interests, in particular in improving our products and services.
Marketing
We may share relevant information and updates about our products and services, either via direct communication with you, or by using online advertisements.
Direct Marketing Communications
When we communicate with you directly to promote our product and service offerings (e.g. by email or phone), we will use your personal data to do so.
What personal data we collect
The types of personal data we collect or process about you to send you such communications include:
Information you have shared directly with us (e.g. when you complete a form to sign-up for such communications), such as your name, email address and/or phone number, age and status as a patient or caregiver, or if you are a business customer, your professional details;
Information that we have obtained through our interactions with you, such as expressions of interest you have made to our sales representatives;
Publicly available information about you (e.g. from the public website of the medical institution where you work);
Metadata collected from cookies or similar techniques, including to understand how you have interacted with our website and whether you have opened or clicked on the content in the emails that we have sent you). For more information on how we use cookies, and your choices in that regard, please click
here
How we use your data
We use such information to tailor our communications to your specific interests and preferred method of communication, to avoid sending you communications that are not of interest or for which you have not consented, and to follow up with you on the subjects that appear to be most relevant and useful for you. To this end, we may organize the data we collect into interest-based groups.
We will ask you to "opt-in" or consent to the use of your personal data for the purposes of such communications, where required by applicable laws. You can decide at any time to stop such communications by using the opt-out procedure provided in the relevant message (e.g., clicking the unsubscribe link in our promotional emails), or alternatively by contacting us as specified in the
How to contact us?
section below. If permitted by applicable law, we may rely on our legitimate interests to carry out some of the activities mentioned above.
Please note that if you choose to no longer receive promotional messages from us, we may still continue to send you relevant information for other lawful purposes, such as to administer any account or contract you may have with us, send you communications of an operational nature (e.g., planned outage or updates), respond to your requests and as required by law (e.g. in case of a product recall).
The Medtronic entity responsible for processing your data for the above purposes is the Medtronic affiliate contacting you (in practice, the Medtronic business entity of the country or region where you are located).
Online Advertising
From time to time you may come across Medtronic ads online, including on social media platforms. Such ads are often presented to you based on your perceived interests, as gathered from your activities on social media or browsing the internet.
What personal data we collect and how we use it
Online advertising may be based on your search terms (in the case of ads on search engines) or user information on online platforms (such as the email address associated with your social media account, the country or professional interests selected on a social media platform).
In some instances, we will use your email address to show ads for our products and services on social media platforms. To do so, we will provide your email address, in a hashed or other secure manner, to the social media platform. The social media platform will then match your email address with the personal data (such as email addresses) you provided to them, and use that information to show you, or other platform users, a particular Medtronic ad. For more information on how social media platforms use your data, please refer to their privacy notices.
We may also place on our websites or apps advertising cookies or similar technologies that are made available by social media platforms or other third parties. If you visit our websites or apps and accept those advertising cookies and similar technologies, where required by law, then the information they collect (such as device identifiers and information on the pages visited) may also be used to display relevant ads for our products and our services on the social media platform or third party's site, and create interest-based profiles for advertising purposes.Often Medtronic itself will not actually receive identifiable data about you when such ads are displayed, but we may be able to further tailor our advertising to you depending on what ads you have already seen, and we can receive aggregated statistics on how many ads have been viewed and clicked on, etc.
We will rely on your consent for the use of your data for online advertising purposes (e.g. when you accept advertising cookies), or otherwise on our legitimate interest to do so where legally permissible. You should be able to configure your cookie settings on websites that use tracking cookies for advertising purposes. For more information on how Medtronic uses cookies, and how to configure your preferences on Medtronic websites, please see our
Cookie Policy
The Medtronic entity responsible for processing your information for the above purposes is the entity placing the advertisement (i.e. the Medtronic business entity in your country or region). For advertising on social media and other platforms, the platform provider itself will also have responsibility for how the advertising on its platform works. Please refer to the policies, privacy controls, and notices on the platform itself for more information on how advertising may be displayed to you, and your choices in this regard.
Ensuring Compliance and Defending Legal Rights
In some circumstances, we are obliged to process personal data to comply with applicable legal requirements and our policies, to perform auditing and other internal functions, or for litigation and dispute resolution purposes.
What personal data we collect
When this is the case, the types of personal data we collect or process about you include your identification and contact information, and any other information as is necessary and relevant to the particular case, e.g., in the event of an (internal) audit, information contained in documents and materials audited, or in the event of litigation, information gathered in the evidence necessary for the litigation.
How we use your data
We will use your information - in an anonymized, de-identified or redacted form, where appropriate - in order to:
comply with applicable legal requirements, regulations, court orders or other legal processes;
comply with our policies;
establish, exercise or defend our legal rights;
conduct (internal) audits, investigations or due diligence checks for the above reasons.
We will do so as necessary to comply with legal obligations to which we are subject in your country or region, or as needed to fulfil our legitimate interests, in particular in conducting business in compliance with all applicable laws and the highest ethical standards, protecting our rights or property; and asserting or defending legal claims, or with your consent where required by law.
Data Sharing
Only duly authorized Medtronic personnel will have access to your personal data as needed to perform their job duties. In addition, we may share your personal data with third parties for the purposes described in this privacy notice.
We may share your personal data with:
§ Medtronic affiliated companies: given the corporate structure of Medtronic, your personal data may be shared with other affiliates within the Medtronic group;
§ Service Providers: we may share personal data with relevant third-party service providers, who act on our behalf to fulfil the activities noted in this privacy notice, including providers of: IT services, communication tools (such as chat functionality, email automation and livestreaming functionality), customer relationship management systems, survey tools or platforms, event organization management tools,  and cloud hosting service providers.
§ Business Partners and Other Specialists: Medtronic may also share personal data with external organizations with which it has partnered (such as research partners and as part of co-branding initiatives), and with external specialists or professional advisors within a particular field (such as lawyers, consultants, tax advisors, auditors, specialist delivery providers, banks, payment service providers, and benchmarking agencies).
§ Parties to a corporate transaction:  We also reserve the right to share your personal data in the event we sell or transfer all or a portion of our business or assets (including in the event of a merger, acquisition, joint venture, reorganization, divestiture, dissolution, or liquidation).
§ Public Authorities and Others for Legal Reasons:  In addition, we may disclose your personal data with other parties, including public and judicial authorities, (1) if we believe we are required to do so by law or legal process (such as a court order or subpoena); (2) in response to requests by government agencies, such as law enforcement or regulatory authorities; (3) to establish, exercise or defend our legal rights; (4) when we believe disclosure is necessary or appropriate to prevent physical or other harm or financial loss; or (5) in connection with an investigation of suspected or actual illegal activity.
§ Others, per your request: With your permission, we may share your personal data with other parties you choose, such as other enrolled users.
International Transfers
In some cases, Medtronic may transmit, or store personal data collected with affiliates, vendors, or sites in other countries. We will only transfer personal data as allowed by applicable law to further the purposes set out in this document. Where personal data is transferred to another country, we take administrative and technical measures to ensure adequate safeguards and protections are applied as provided for by applicable law. In cases where personal data is transmitted to other countries, we will ensure that safeguards equivalent to those required by applicable data protection laws are in place (such as the European Commission's Standard Contractual Clauses). For more information on the safeguards implemented by Medtronic, please contact us as specified in the
How to Contact Us
section below.
Data Retention
We will keep your personal data for so long as necessary to fulfill the purposes for which we are allowed to use them, as set out in this privacy notice. Your data may be kept longer in order to take into account applicable statute of limitation periods, or as otherwise required by law. For more information on the retention of your personal data, please contact us as indicated in the
How to Contact Us
section below.
Your Privacy Rights
You may have certain rights in relation to the personal data we process about you, depending on the reason for which we process your data or the lawful basis we rely on to do so. To the extent provided by applicable law, you can:
request access to the personal data we hold about you. Your request should contain a detailed, accurate description of the personal data you want access to;
ask us to correct information about yourself you think is inaccurate or incomplete.
object, based on your particular situation, to any use or processing of your personal data based on our legitimate interests;
withdraw the consent you previously provided to us for using your data. If you do so, this will not affect the lawfulness of data that we have processed before you withdrew consent;
ask us to receive, in a structured, commonly used and machine-readable format, the personal data you have provided to us and to have this information transmitted to another company, where it is technically feasible. This right may apply only in certain circumstances, where you have provided your personal data to us based on your consent or a contract to which you are party;
ask us to restrict or limit our use of your personal data.
ask us to delete your personal data. Note that we may not be able to delete all your personal data as this right only applies in certain circumstances, e.g., when your data is no longer necessary in light of the purposes explained in this privacy notice and there is no legal or regulatory obligation which obliges us to keep it.
If you wish to exercise your rights, please contact us as specified in the
How to Contact Us
section below. In certain cases, we may ask you to confirm your identity before we can process your request.
Depending on your location, you may have the right to file a complaint with a data protection authority, in particular in the country of your habitual residence, if you are not satisfied with our response.
U.S. Consumer Privacy Rights
If you are within the United States, you may have certain choices regarding our use and disclosure of your personal information, as described below, depending on your state of residence and the data involved. For a complete description of our privacy practices, including data retention policies, data subject request and rights information, and data practices over the past twelve months, please see
https://www.medtronic.com/us-en/privacy-statement.html
Know
: you may have a right to know of or confirm the existence of your personal data, any processing we do with it, and review our practices of data collection and processing, such as knowing what categories of personal data we process, our purposes of processing, and categories of party to whom we disclose.
Access and portability
: you may have a right to access your personal data, accessing specific pieces of information, and knowing to which third parties your data was disclosed. You may have a right to obtain a copy of your data, including in a machine-readable format.
Correction
: you may have a right to correct or amend your data if it is incomplete, inaccurate, or outdated.
Deletion
or
elimination
: you may have a right to request your personal data be deleted or eliminated. Subject to applicable law, we may deidentify this data in certain circumstances.
Restriction
: you may have a right to restrict processing of your data in some circumstances, such as if processing is excessive or unlawful, the accuracy of the data is contested, the controller no longer needs the data for its primary processing purposes but is needed for legal or compliance purposes, or if (in California) the data is sensitive personal data like health information and it is being used for purposes beyond those reasonably necessary to perform services or provide goods requested.
Objection
and
opt-out
: you may have a right to object to or opt-out of processing of your data in certain circumstances, including in cases where that data is used for direct marketing (including email or telephonic marketing), shared with third parties for their own marketing or for retargeted/cross-contextual marketing, sold to third parties, used to make certain decisions or profiles about you by automated or artificial means, used for historical or scientific research, or used to place automated/prerecorded voice telephonic messages to you in some cases.
Consent
: you may have a right to consent, and to withhold or withdraw that consent, for some practices, including processing of sensitive personal data or data on children, or where we use consent as our lawful basis for processing or transfer. If you withdraw consent, we will not further collect or process the personal data covered by that consent unless allowed or required by applicable law.
Non-discrimination
: you will not be discriminated against for your exercise of your rights. This does not necessarily include, depending on applicable law in your jurisdiction, cases where a difference in price or services offered is reasonably related to the value provided by your data, or where you consent to participate in a voluntary loyalty or similar incentive program.
Appeal internally
: you may have a right to appeal a decision we make about the exercise of your rights within Medtronic.
Complain externally
: you may have a right to complain to a regulator, including a Data Protection or Supervisory Authority or a trade standards authority, if you are not satisfied with our response to your request, such as not having responded to you within a reasonable time or you disagree with our determination, or have concerns about our data practices. If you ask us, we will try to provide you with information about complaint pathways that may be open to you depending on your location and circumstances.
HIPAA and Protected Health Information
. This privacy notice does not apply to our data processing activities and practices for Protected Health Information, which is regulated under the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996. In those cases, you may have received a Notice of Privacy Practices from Medtronic or your health care provider which will govern that data use.
Deidentifying data under HIPAA
. Where we operate under HIPAA (the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996) as a Covered Entity or Business Associate, we may deidentify data under HIPAA's Privacy Rule using either the "Safe Harbor" method (which calls for the removal of a set list of identifiers) or the "Expert Determination" method (which calls for an independent expert to use statistical analysis to determine if a particular data set is reasonably identifiable). This data will be "deidentified data" as well.
Covered data practices disclosure
. For the scope of the activities covered by this privacy notice, Medtronic does not sell your personal data, disclose it to data brokers, nor disclose to unrelated third parties for their own direct marketing purposes. Except as stated in our
cookie policy
, we do not share your data for cross-contextual retargeted marketing purposes.
How to contact us?
If you want to exercise any of your data protection rights, please contact our
European Privacy Office at
rs.privacyeurope@medtronic.com
(include Digital Surgery as a reference in your email)
Greater China Data Office at
rs.gcdataprivacyoffice@medtronic.com
Global Privacy Office at
rs.globaldataprivacyoffice@medtronic.com
or at
this link
or by calling +1/866 639-6907 (in the United States).
We might ask you to give us information that helps us confirm you are who you say you are. This is to ensure we keep yours and our other users' personal data safe. We will, however, make sure that we don't collect data for identity verification unless we really need to for security reasons.
Medtronic's Data Protection Officer may be contacted at
europeanDPO@medtronic.com
Updates to this Privacy Notice
This privacy notice may be updated periodically to reflect changes in our personal data practices. We will indicate at the top of the privacy notice when it was most recently updated.
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://europe.medtronic.com/xd-en/privacy-statement/hcp-education-services-privacy-statement.html:
You just clicked a link to go to another website. If you continue, you may go to a site run by someone else.
We do not review or control the content on non-Medtronic sites, and we are not responsible for any business dealings or transactions you have there. Your use of the other site is subject to the terms of use and privacy statement on that site.
It is possible that some of the products on the other site are not approved in your region or country.
Your browser is out of date
With an updated browser, you will have a better Medtronic website experience.
Update my browser now.
×
The content of this website is exclusively reserved for Healthcare Professionals in countries with applicable health authority product registrations, except those practicing in France as some of the content is not in compliance with the French Advertising law N°2011-2012 dated 29th December 2011, article 34.
Click “OK” to confirm you are a Healthcare Professional.
Home
Privacy Notice
HCP Education Services
Privacy Statement
This Privacy Statement tells you how we use information that we collect about you in relation to the consultancy, training and education services that link to this Privacy Statement. This Privacy Statement does not apply to situations where we have notified you that an alternative privacy statement applies.
Introduction
Medtronic (hereinafter referred to as “we”) provides and facilitates consultancy, training, and education services delivered by and to healthcare professionals (hereinafter referred to as “you”), focusing on the safe and effective use of Medtronic products and services or specific to a disease or protocol (hereinafter referred to as “Services”). The Services may be delivered in-person or remotely, including through accessing or logging into a teleconferencing or learning management system provided by Medtronic or a third party engaged by Medtronic for this purpose. The systems and programs used to deliver the Services are hereinafter referred to as the “Platform”.
Some minimal personal information is typically collected in order to deliver these learning Services. We will Process your Personal Data, as strictly relevant to the provision of the Services. We understand that you are aware of and care about your own personal privacy interests and we take that seriously. This Privacy Statement describes Medtronic’s practices regarding its collection and use of your Personal Data and sets forth your privacy rights. We encourage you to read this Privacy Statement carefully.
Definitions
By ”Personal Data” we mean any information which relates to an identified/identifiable natural person, in other words, any information which can lead to knowing who you are (either directly or indirectly).
By “Processing” we mean any operation which is performed on Personal Data, such as collection, recording, organisation, structuring, storage, adaptation or alteration, retrieval, consultation, use, disclosure by transmission, dissemination or otherwise making available, alignment or combination, restrictions, erasure or destruction.
By “Consent” we mean your freely given, specific, informed and unambiguous (not subject to misinterpretation or more than one interpretation) indication of your wishes by which you, by a statement or by a clear affirmative action, signify agreement to the Processing of your Personal Data.
By “Aggregated Data” we mean that data from different sources are combined to observe trends and patterns over a large population/group. By using a large population/group and deriving statistics from it, we minimise identification to unique individuals.
Personal data categories
For the provision of our Services, we may Process the following categories of Personal Data:
Contact and account details
– when you register for the Services, we may collect Personal Data such as: first name, last name, email-address, postal address, profession, therapy group, primary medical specialty, hospital/clinic name, city, country of practice, access rights requested, username and password as needed for any Platform log-in. In case required by national law, physician number, nurses and allied professional number will be collected.
Training and education data
– when you access the Services the following data may be collected and linked to you, including through the creation of a learning profile for this purpose: course attendance, learning program progress, assessment/observation results at single question level, course evaluation, course completion, certification, training exemptions, results of knowledge tests, learning modules and resources viewed, and feedback assessments.
Travel information
- to organise and facilitate in-person training, events or meetings we may Process the following additional Personal Data needed for trip and event management purposes: national ID/passport number, dietary and travel preferences, logistics and travel details, expenses.
Trainer/Consultant Information
– If you are engaged by Medtronic to provide the Services we may Process additional Personal Data in order to administer our contractual relationship, including basic identity information, contact details, professional activities and affiliations, professional qualifications, financial information on honoraria paid by Medtronic, and bank account information.
Images/Video/Audio
– The delivery of the Services may involve photography or video recording by Medtronic, or make use of a Platform that will transmit your audio, video and/or image to other participants.  You will be informed if Medtronic intends to actually capture and record any such Personal Data for further use.
Additional Information
– If you provide additional information such as personal preferences, we will process such data in accordance with this privacy statement. Medtronic may identify certain characteristics, preferences or traits on the basis of which we may create or compile professional, financial or behavioural profiles for the purposes mentioned below.
Purposes and legal basis for processing
Contract
: We Process your Personal Data to provide the Services, based on your free choice to enroll / participate in our Services or your engagement with Medtronic to provide the Services. This serves as our contract with you or with the organisation on whose behalf you are engaged or subscribe/participate (hereinafter referred as a “Contract”) and such serves as our legal basis for Processing your Personal Data for the following purposes:
For the provision of the Services
: to design and deliver the Services, to create and maintain your learning account, to create charts, tables and reports which can help you understand your progress through Medtronic learning pathways, to enable Medtronic to provide you with additional training and education content and other information to assist you with your training and education experience, to create and distribute Service deliverables (e.g. training materials and recordings, if applicable);
To facilitate event/training support
: to communicate with you regarding the Services (including replying to your queries and questions), to provide you with notifications of event or training information (e.g. registration, schedule) and relevant follow up (surveys, thank you notes)
Legitimate Interests
: When we Process your Personal Data for carefully considered purposes based on the legitimate interests of Medtronic or another party, we do so, based on our assessment that such legitimate interests do not override your data protection rights. We may Process your Personal Data for the following purposes, based on legitimate interests:
To get a better understanding of how effective our Services are;
To identify where our Services may require improvement;
To optimise the learning experience, by tracking and managing individual and account-based learning pathways and progress, and analysing such data within the Platform;
To measure event participation and effectiveness;
To analyse performance metrics and survey results, in order to improve training effectiveness;
To aggregate Personal Data to a level where you are no longer directly identifiable. Such information is used to create and communicate statistics on the general use of our Platform in order to:
Gain a better understanding about the use of our products and training and education services;
Measure expenditure on our training and education activities and face to face events per region/Business Unit, to better understand business needs and further develop our strategy;
Understand how training has been delivered within categories like medical specialty, country of practice;
To get better insights into the resources and costs associated with providing our Services;
To use imagery, audio or video footage from the Services for educational, promotional or other legitimate business purposes. In such circumstances Medtronic will take measures designed to reasonably protect your privacy rights.
Legal Rights and Obligations
: We may also process your Personal Data on the basis of our
legal right or obligation
do so in order to:
Comply with laws including those regarding transparency and the management of training on the safe and effective use of our products;
To track and manage compliance approvals and violations;
In the event of a legal claim: for the establishment, exercise or defence of a legal claim.
Consent
: We may also process your Personal Data for other purposes for which you have specifically given Consent. Such purposes may include:
Use of your image or audio or video footage for educational, promotional, or other legitimate business purposes to which you specifically Consent (where such use is not already covered by the terms of your Contract);
Where Consent is required to send you communications regarding products or services that may be of interest (see further Marketing Communications below);
In case we need to process any sensitive Personal Data (such as health data) in connection with the Services, we will only do so on the basis of your explicit Consent.
Marketing Communications
: to the extent that we send you communications regarding products and services that we believe may be of interest to you, we will only do so on the basis of
legitimate interests
or your
Consent
, in accordance with applicable laws. You may at any time opt-out of receiving such communications via the opt-out mechanism included in the relevant communication, or by Contacting Us as set out below.
How long does Medtronic keep your personal data for?
Your Personal Data will only be retained by Medtronic for so long as necessary and relevant to fulfil the purposes set out herein and may be retained beyond the duration of your business relationship with Medtronic to enable us to fulfil such purposes and comply with legal requirements to demonstrate adherence to Medtronic’s obligation to manage training to Health Care Professionals for safe and effective use of our products.
For more information on where and how long your Personal Data is stored, please send an email to
privacyeurope@medtronic.com
Cross border Data Transfer
Personal Data may be Processed by Medtronic and its affiliates, as well as its third-party service providers, contractors and consultants inside and outside the European Economic Area (EEA). When European Personal Data is transferred outside the EEA, UK or Switzerland, we use approved legal mechanisms, which may include standard data protection clauses (EU Model Clauses), to meet data protection laws and requirements. More details can be requested by sending an email to
privacyeurope@medtronic.com
Data sharing
Certain components of the Platform are provided by third party providers. We may use third party service providers in order to achieve the purposes set out in this Privacy Statement including:
to deliver the Services through a Virtual Classroom, Teleconferencing or Learning Management System;
to manage our relationship and communications with you through Communications Tools and Customer Relationship Management Systems;
to effectively gather your feedback through a Survey Tool; and
to manage your registration and travel arrangements through an Event Management Tool.
We will enter into binding agreements with these service providers which include data processing clauses to ensure that your Personal Data is always Processed in accordance with applicable data protection laws and regulations.
In the event that you engage directly with a third party service provider outside the scope of the Medtronic Services (e.g. by interacting with their website or availing of additional services from them) please note that the third party’s own privacy statement will apply to any resulting Processing of your Personal Data.
Security of your personal data
Medtronic is committed to protecting the security and confidentiality of your Personal Data. We use technical and organisational measures designed to protect your Personal Data against unauthorised or unlawful destruction, loss, alteration, disclosure or access.
Your rights
Subject to applicable law, you may have the right to:
Request access to the Personal Data we have concerning you
Request rectification, erasure, or restriction of the Processing of your Personal Data (including deletion of your Learning Management account).
Object, based on your particular situation, to any use or Processing of your Personal Data which we have based on our legitimate interests;
Request your Personal Data in a structured, commonly used and machine-readable format (data portability)
If we use your Personal Data based on your Consent, you can withdraw your Consent at any time and discontinue the relevant data Processing activities. Note that this does not affect the lawfulness of Processing based on Consent before your withdrawal.
Please note that we may keep using Aggregated Data (statistics, trends), even after you request deletion of your Personal Data or withdraw your Consent, as there may be no technical means available to isolate or identify the data elements to exclude.
Please note that the above rights are generally applicable to the Services offered to our customers in Europe but may be limited in some other jurisdictions according to applicable law. To exercise these rights, or for more information, please send an email to:
privacyeurope@medtronic.com
. Please note that in accordance with applicable laws, we may ask you to provide some proof of identity before we can process your request.
In case you are not satisfied with our handling of your request you may contact the applicable Data Protection Authority.
Contact
The Services are facilitated and carried out by the Medtronic entity identified in the Contract or other documentation provided in connection with the Services. Please note that in case the Services are provided through an engagement or collaboration with your institution or employer, then they may also be responsible (independently, or together with Medtronic) for the Processing of your Personal Data in connection with the Services, in which case your institution or employer should be your first point of contact in that regard. Medtronic’s EMEA Headquarters is located at
Medtronic International Trading Sárl
Route du Molliau 31
CH - 1131 Tolochenaz
Email
privacyeurope@medtronic.com
This Privacy statement is published on May 15, 2020.
We recognise that data protection is an ongoing responsibility, so we will update this Privacy Statement in case we undertake new Personal Data practices or adopt new privacy policies.
Open share options
Print
Email
Copy Link
Close share options
About cookies
We use necessary and audience measurement cookies to make this site work and produce anonymous statistics. We'd also like to set cookies and similar technologies to improve the functionality of the site, further analyze visitors' activity, and show personalized ads. These will be set only if you accept them. You can change your mind at any time by clicking on the "Cookie" icon at the bottom left of each page.  To learn more on the cookies we use and the third parties that are setting cookies on our site, click “Cookie preferences”.
Cookie preferences
Reject all
Accept all
Cookie preference center
When you visit our website, we store cookies on your browser to collect information. The information collected might relate to you, your preferences or your device, and is mostly used to make the site work as you expect it to and to provide a more personalized web experience. However, you can choose not to allow certain types of cookies, which may impact your experience of the site and the services we are able to offer. Click on the different category headings to find out more and change our default settings according to your preference. You cannot opt-out of our Necessary Cookies as they are deployed in order to ensure the proper functioning of our website (such as prompting the cookie banner and remembering your settings, to log into your account, to redirect you when you log out, etc.). For more information about the First and Third Party Cookies used, please follow this link:
Cookie Policy
Allow all
Cookie preferences
Always active
These cookies are necessary for the site to function and cannot be switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as setting your privacy or language preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You may disable these by changing your browser settings, but this may affect how the website functions.
View Vendor Details‎
Technical Analytics Cookies (Audience Measurement)
These cookies are necessary for the day-to-day operation of the site. They are set and used only by us to produce anonymized statistics about the use of the site to ensure it is performing correctly. You may disable them at any time by changing your cookie preferences in this tool.
View Vendor Details‎
Non-Technical Analytics Cookies
These cookies allow us to further analyze visitors' activity on our site so we can measure and improve the effectiveness of our online services. They may be set by us or by third-party analytics service providers.  If you don't allow these cookies, we will not be able to monitor the effectiveness of our services.
Analytics Cookies
Switch Label
label
These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around the site. If you do not allow these cookies we will not know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor its performance.
View Vendor Details‎
Functionality Cookies
These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality  such as video content. They may be set by us or by third party providers whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
View Vendor Details‎
Advertising Cookies
These cookies may be set through our site by us or our advertising partners. They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your interests and show you personalised ads on other sites based on your browsing history and profile.    They do not store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely identifying your browser and internet device. These cookies may also include a range of social media services that we have added to the site to enable you to share our content with your friends and networks. They are capable of tracking your browser across other sites and building up a profile of your interests. This may impact the content and messages you see on other websites you visit.
View Vendor Details‎
Back Button
Vendors List
Search Icon
Filter Icon
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
Sub-policy 1
https://www.medtronic.com/us-en/privacy-statement.html:
Medtronic privacy notice
For medtronic.com and related sources within the United States
Last updated: October 2024
This notice describes how Medtronic collects and uses information about you (“personal data”) in connection with the activities described below, including when you order Medtronic products and services, when you visit this website and Medtronic locations, when you contact Medtronic, or when you participate in Medtronic events, surveys, or clinical studies in the United States.
Unless set out otherwise below, the Medtronic company responsible for processing your personal data is
Medtronic Inc.
(together “Medtronic,“ “we,” or “us”).
In this privacy notice, we will tell you what personal data we obtain about you, how we use that information, with whom we share it, what rights you have regarding your information, and how to contact us to exercise these rights. Medtronic and some of its affiliates, including Medtronic Minimed™, and our international affiliates, also operate other websites.
This privacy notice does not apply when you have been notified that an alternative notice applies (for example, on other Medtronic websites) or where Medtronic processes your personal data on behalf of your medical institution or healthcare professional in connection with your medical treatment. Your medical institution and/or healthcare professional is solely responsible for the processing of your personal data for the provision of your medical treatment and care. It also does not apply to data processing activities specifically relating to current or former Medtronic employees or applicants — the relevant notice may be requested by contacting
Ask HR
.
Download and print the privacy notice.
This section describes how Medtronic uses your personal data to provide you with therapies and related services. Unless we need your personal data in order to comply with laws and regulations, you are not required to provide information to us, but if you choose not to do so we may not be able to offer you certain services and related features or to respond to requests that you may have. The following situations are discussed in more detail below:
When you visit our websites or apps, we may collect and/or process your personal data (from your interaction with our sites) to learn more about how you use our site/app and services.
What personal data we obtain
Electronic device
information, including identifiers associated with your devices, operating system type and characteristics
Internet and
network activity
information, including internet protocol (IP) address, domain name, web browser characteristics, language preferences, navigation, and your interactions with our site or app (such as the pages you visit, links you click, features you use, dates and times of access to our site/app, browsing history, search history, the pages that led or referred you to our site), and other information about your use of our site or app
Geolocation
data, including approximate location information from your use of our site/app
Certain information by
automated means, including cookies and similar technologies
, such as Flash cookies, local storage, web beacons and pixels, JavaScript, software development kits (SDKs) and device identifiers
How we use your data
Ensure our sites or apps operate correctly and secure logins work properly
Improve visitor experience and learn how they use our sites/apps and their features
Provide you with enhanced functionality such as video content and show you targeted ads on other sites or social media channels
Depending on your location, some cookies may require your consent. See our
cookie policy
to learn more about our use of cookies and how to manage cookie setting and preferences.
When you create an account or register your device with us, we may collect and process your personal data to create and manage the account or to respond to your request for information about therapies or related services.
What personal data we obtain
Identification
information, such as your name, user ID number, date of birth or age, phone number, email address, physical address, and mailing address
Location
data, such as your country/region and language preference
Login
credentials
, such as your username/email address and password
Information about your
medical device
, such as its identification/serial number(s), model and type, and other status information related to it
Professional information
of a healthcare professional account holder, such as your profession, your job title and your medical specialty, the name of the institution you work for, and your professional email address
How we use your data
Create and
manage your account
, including to authenticate you and ensure account security
Together with the information collected through our products or services, we may
communicate with you about and provide you with the products and services you requested
, unless you have been notified that an alternative notice applies to such use
Engage in
health vigilance activities
, post-market surveillance, recall, complaint, and quality monitoring, and similar activities, described below
You may make an inquiry, or require assistance or support, by contacting our customer service or support team by phone or email, or by using our “
How to contact us
” form, our chat tools, and automated communications assistants, or other customer support tools.
What personal data we obtain
If you contact our customer and support services to make an inquiry or request support, the types of personal data we obtain or process about you from that interaction include the following.
Contact information you directly submit to us
, including name, title, physical, postal, and email address, and telephone number
Medical device identifiers
or information, including device serial number
Demographic
information, including country of residence, date of birth, and age
Preferences
including preferred language
Session information and device and network identifiers
including IP address
Other
information about you necessary
for dealing with your request, including data relating to your device or health if you’re a patient
Recordings and notes
if we record the conversation we have with you
Other
content posted or submitted by you
including your relationship to Medtronic that you indicate, the type of healthcare provider you are if applicable, stage of education or training, and areas of interest
How we use your data
To
respond
to you, provide you with required support, and follow up on your request, including, where applicable, ensuring compliance with our regulatory obligations and establishing, exercising, or defending ourselves from legal claims
We may use
automated communications assistants
including “chatbots” and other contact aides to route, analyze, and respond to your customer and support service interactions, as well as to improve our automated communications assistants, products, services, and therapies.
We may also
keep a record of the communications
we have with you for evidentiary purposes and to train our personnel and improve the quality of our services. If you call us, you will be notified at the beginning of the call whether our conversation will be recorded.
To perform
analytics and research
To
improve our products
, content, and services
To perform
quality assurance
and
complaint handling
functions
To detect, investigate, and
respond to malicious and fraudulent activities
To
debug and repair our products
and services
Please note that, in some circumstances, we may use your data to
provide technical support on behalf of and in the name of your medical institution or healthcare professional
. This is the case if the Medtronic product or service you use was provided to your medical institution or healthcare professional as part of the services Medtronic provides to them. If that product or service requires technical support, we’ll use your data as directed by your medical institution and/or healthcare professional as part of your medical treatment. Contact your medical institution or healthcare professional to learn more about their use of your data for the provision of medical treatment or care.
As a manufacturer of medical devices, we are subject to regulatory obligations when we place (or make available or put into service) our products on the market. Compliance with those obligations require us to process personal data.
What personal data we obtain
The types of personal data we obtain or process as a manufacturer of medical devices, which may be obtained from your interactions with or submissions to our site, your account, your medical device’s registration or telemetry data, or from your healthcare provider(s), as well as from information you communicate to us or post on a public forum, include:
Data allowing the
identification of the patient or person exposed to an adverse health event
, such as age, year or date of birth, gender, weight, height, and identification number
Data relating to the
identification of the product
concerned, such as the type of product used, serial number, and implant date
Other information necessary for the assessment of an undesirable health event
, such as professional life, health data, therapy data, consumption of tobacco, alcohol, or drugs, and life habit and behavior
Contact details of the person who made a complaint
or notified us of an adverse health event, or of any health professional likely to provide details.
How we use your data
Conduct
health vigilance related activities
, including managing adverse health events and handling product complaints. We’ll do so to ensure compliance with our legal obligations and with high standards of quality and safety of healthcare and medical devices.
When we communicate with you directly to promote our product and service offerings (e.g., by email or phone), we will use your personal data to do so.
What personal data we obtain
The types of personal data we obtain or process about you to send you such communications include:
Information you have shared directly with us
(e.g., when you complete a form to sign up for such communications), such as your name, email address and/or phone number, age, and status as a patient or caregiver, or — if you are a business customer, your professional details
Information that we have
obtained through our interactions with you
, such as expressions of interest you have made to our sales representatives
Publicly available information about you
(e.g., from the public website of the medical institution where you work)
Metadata collected from cookies or similar technologies
, including to understand how you have interacted with our website and whether you have opened or clicked on the content in the emails that we have sent you. For more information on how we use cookies, and your choices in that regard, see our
cookie policy
.
How we use your data
To
tailor our communications to your specific interests
and
preferred
method
of communication
To
avoid sending you communications that are not of interest
or for which you have not consented
To
follow up with you on the subjects that appear to be most relevant
and useful for you. To this end, we may organize the data we obtain into interest-based groups
We will ask you to “opt-in” or consent to the use of your personal data for the purposes of such communications where required by applicable laws. You can decide at any time to stop such communications by using the opt-out procedure provided in the relevant message (e.g., clicking the unsubscribe link in our promotional emails), or alternatively by contacting us as specified in the “How to Contact Us” section below.
Please note that if you choose to no longer receive promotional messages from us, we may still continue to send you relevant information for other lawful purposes, such as to administer any account or contract you may have with us, send you communications of an operational nature (e.g., planned outage or updates), respond to your requests and as required by law (e.g., in case of a product recall).
When you visit our websites or apps, we may collect certain information by automated means, including cookies and similar technologies, such as Flash cookies, local storage, web beacons and pixels, JavaScript, software development kits (SDKs) and device identifiers. While personal data collected through these technologies is not shared for money or other similar compensation, the use of these technologies may be considered personal data sharing under applicable law. The types of technologies, purposes of use, parties involved, and controls available to you, which may vary across our digital offerings, are detailed in our
cookie policy
.
You may send us a private or direct message via social media, or you may communicate about us or Medtronic products on social media (e.g., if you participate in our online communities, share a comment about a Medtronic product, or tag Medtronic in your post).
What personal data we obtain
If you interact on social media with or about us, the types of personal data we obtain or process about you from that interaction include:
Social media information
, such as your social media username, profile picture, country
Information about you that is contained in
your comments, posts, or other content
about Medtronic that you share on social media services
How we use your data
To
review or respond to your message or comments
, and where applicable, to provide you with the required support and take any necessary follow-up actions
Using your data to
understand your feedback
and
improve our products
and services if you communicate about us or our products
You may visit our locations in order to interact with our personnel, to provide services or perform certain tasks.
What personal data we obtain
If you visit Medtronic locations, the types of personal data we obtain or process about you include:
Your
contact information and visit details
, such as your name, signature and arrival/departure time and date, to enable you to access our premises and provide you with a badge as applicable
Video recordings of you
if we operate closed-circuit television (CCTV) systems in the location you visit
How we use your data
We will use this information for
security and safety
reasons, including ensuring the security of Medtronic personnel, property and assets, and complying with our internal security policies.
You may wish to participate in one of our physical or virtual events (such as workshops, meetings, webinars or live broadcast events), or we may ask you to share your story, provide a testimonial or take part in an interview about your treatment with a Medtronic product. In this case, we’ll need to process some personal data about you, as described below.
What personal data we obtain
If you participate in one of our events, testimonials or interviews, the types of personal data we obtain or process about you from your participation include:
Identification/contact information
, such as your name (or a fictitious name to protect your privacy), email address, nationality, country
Personal details
, such as dietary requirements, where applicable
Professional information
, such as your job type and title
Product(s)/service(s) of interest
to you, where applicable
Health data
, such as the medical condition treated by the Medtronic product (if you’re providing information as a patient)
Images, video and/or audio
recordings of you
, if our event/interview is filmed or recorded
How we use your data
We will use your data to
organize and facilitate the event
/interview, and conduct our
educational, promotional, and advertising
activities.
From time to time, we may invite you to participate in a Medtronic survey to gather your feedback to help us determine customer satisfaction levels, identify areas of potential improvement or to carry out market research.
What personal data we obtain
To the extent possible, we will gather your feedback in an anonymous manner. In some cases, however, the survey may gather identifiable respondent information. In such instances, the types of the personal data we obtain or process about you includes:
Identification/contact information
, such as your name, email address, phone number
Professional details
(if you are a business customer), such as your employer’s details, specialty, professional experience, professional qualifications
Opinions, views, or
information you choose to provide us
as part of your survey responses. If you’re a patient, this may include your age and information about your health, such as your medical condition, type of Medtronic product/services you are treated with, details of the medical procedure you underwent as a patient.
Where applicable,
information collected by automated means (including cookies)
, such as your IP address, and survey metadata (e.g., the language you take the survey in, duration of your survey response, last date the survey was started)
How we use your data
We will use your personal data to
conduct the survey
, including to send it to you, allow you to submit your survey responses, prevent survey fraud, analyze the survey results, and improve or develop our products and services, accordingly.
We perform clinical activities, including clinical studies, clinical investigations, clinical surveys and other studies or research activities. In this context, we process personal data of participants to these activities, as well as personal data of healthcare personnel involved in such activities.
What personal data we obtain
The types of personal data we obtain or process this way will vary depending on the research activity, but this will generally include:
Information
indirectly identifying participants
in those research activities (such as age or date of birth, place of birth, gender, country and department of residence, serial number or alphanumeric code excluding first and last name)
Where applicable,
administrative data identifying participants
that may be obtained by our service providers (such as first and last name, contact details, bank details) for very limited purposes, including to reimburse transport costs and/or to pay compensation
Data concerning
participants’ health
, including vital status, and any other sensitive data, as relevant to the subject of the research activity (such as participants’ ethnic origin or data concerning sexual life)
Dates relating to the
conduct of the research activity
, including the date of inclusion
Details of participants’
personal and professional life
, such as family situation, current profession, business trips, consumption of tobacco, alcohol, drugs, lifestyle habits and behaviors, and any other relevant information
Insurance information
, including health insurer or payer information
Participation in other research
activities
Reimbursement of
costs
incurred
by the participant
Annual
amount of compensation
received
For such activities, we typically have no access to directly identifiable information about patients as that information is kept confidential by the relevant healthcare professional except if required for the purposes of the study.
If you’re a healthcare professional involved in our (clinical) research activities, the types of personal data we obtain or process about you include:
Identification data, such as name, gender, professional contact details, bank details
Training and qualifications
Other relevant details of professional life (e.g., professional curriculum)
If applicable, identification number in the directory of health professionals
Amount of compensation and remuneration received
Collaboration in research activities
History of access, and connection to the medical data of participants in the research activities, where relevant
How we use your data
To carry out
research activities in the public interest
, including to generate evidence to submit to health regulatory authorities in order to comply with our medical device manufacturer’s obligations, to assess the safety, performance and quality of our medical devices, and to develop and improve the safety and performance of these medical devices aiming at enhancing and improving healthcare
We will do so based on your consent or as required by applicable law in conducting research activities, for scientific research, or to ensure high standards of quality and safety of our products and services.
The Medtronic entity responsible for the processing of your personal data is the sponsor or Medtronic entity that determines the purposes of the clinical study or research project, as indicated in the clinical study or research documentation or in other relevant documentation provided by the healthcare professional in connection with the clinical or research activities you participate in.
In some circumstances, we process personal data to comply with applicable legal requirements and our policies, to perform auditing and other internal functions, or for litigation and dispute resolution purposes.
What personal data we obtain
When this is the case, the types of personal data we obtain or process about you include:
Your
identification and contact information
Other information as is necessary and relevant
to the particular case; e.g., in the event of an (internal) audit, information contained in documents and materials audited, or in the event of litigation, information gathered in the evidence necessary for the litigation
How we use your data
We will use your information — in an anonymized, de-identified or redacted form, where appropriate — in order to:
Fulfill our contract with you
when it is our legal duty
Support and manage our therapies
or related services by our service providers and/or business partners
Manage our
relationship with you
and keep our records up to date
Manage websites
for healthcare professionals, account access support, verify your personal identity as needed for us to provide our therapies or related services, online support, and related services safely and lawfully
Properly
administer our business
, therapies, or related services
Enforce, establish, exercise, or defend our legal rights
, including this privacy notice and other rules about use of our product or services
Protect and secure
websites, networks, systems, data, and services Medtronic provides to our customers
Manage
compliance
with our policies, including conducting (internal) audits, investigations, or due diligence checks for the above reasons
Understand how to
improve our therapies
or related services
Comply with applicable
legal requirements
, regulations, court orders, or other legal processes
With the authorization of your medical institution, the data obtained as part of the services provided to your medical institution may be further used to support and improve those services, including to improve and develop Medtronic products and services, to conduct benchmarking, business analytics or market research, to train and educate Medtronic personnel or healthcare professionals, or to support regulatory filings and the reimbursement of Medtronic products and services.
Some of the data we collect and use is considered sensitive under applicable laws, which may include, for example, health- and financial-related data and genetic/biometric data. Our collection and use of sensitive personal data is limited to that which is necessary to provide you with your requested services, including treating your condition, and for additional purposes for which you have provided your consent. You can choose to withdraw or withhold your consent. However, where your sensitive data is necessary to provide you with services, you will not be able to use those services.
We may ask that you, your caregiver, your account administration, or any individual authorized by you not to send or disclose any other personal data other than the data that we may ask you to provide.
By disclosing the phone number(s) you provide to Medtronic, we may contact those number(s), including via text, SMS, or voice call, for the transactional purposes defined in this privacy notice, as well as for responding to requests you make of Medtronic. If you provide an additional consent for marketing communications, Medtronic may then contact you by telephone for marketing, advertising, or offers of sale of Medtronic therapies or related services as well.
When making contact by telephone, we may use automated technologies (including recordings and auto-dialing), and telephone, airtime, message, and data rates may apply. By providing your phone number(s) and/or consent(s), you certify that (a) you are age 13 and older, (b) the contact information you provide is yours, and (c) you authorize and consent to use of the information provided for Medtronic to contact you. Consent is not a condition for purchase or services. You may opt out of telephonic contact from Medtronic using automated technologies and for marketing communications at any time by texting ”STOP” in reply to a text message or for marketing messages, signing into your Medtronic profile and updating your communication preferences.
In the ordinary course of business in carrying out the purposes described in this notice, we may share your personal data with certain categories of third parties, including:
Medtronic-affiliated companies:
Given the corporate structure of Medtronic, your personal data may be shared with other affiliates within the Medtronic group.
Service providers:
We may share personal data with relevant third-party service providers, who act on our behalf to fulfill the activities noted in this privacy notice, including IT providers, providers of communication tools and customer relationship management systems, survey tool providers or platforms, event organization management tool providers, outsourced operations such as accounts payable providers, email automation tool providers, cloud hosting service providers, and contract management platform providers.
Healthcare providers and regulators:
As described above, we may disclose personal data to your physician to coordinate or manage your healthcare and related services. This may also include other healthcare provider(s) who, at your request, become involved with the management of your care, online account, or related services. Medtronic may also disclose your personal data to health oversight agencies such as government regulators to support with audits, investigations, and inspections.
To business and other specialists:
We may share personal data with external organizations with which it has partnered (such as research partners and as part of co-branding initiatives), and with external specialists or professional advisors within a particular field (such as lawyers, consultants, tax advisors, auditors, specialist delivery providers, banks, payment service providers, and benchmarking agencies).
Parties to a corporate transaction:
We may share your personal data as necessary with parties to a potential, pending, or in process corporate transaction, such as if we sell or transfer all or a portion of our business or assets, or if we undergo a merger, acquisition, joint venture, reorganization, divestiture, dissolution, or liquidation.
For legal and other related interests:
We may share personal data where:
Required by law
Required to disclose and/or share your personal data with regulatory, public, or governmental authorities to comply with any law, regulation, court order, legal, or government request
Allowed or required by law for public health purposes, including reporting complaints and quality issues to medical device regulators
Needed to protect its own or others vital interests, including the safety of life and property, or for investigating illegal or malicious activities, where allowed by law
Needed to exercise or defend legal claims
Needed with its corporate affiliates, who have the same privacy requirements
Others, per your request:
With your consent, we may share your personal data with other parties you choose, such as your caregivers.
In some cases, Medtronic may transmit, or store personal data collected with affiliates, vendors, or sites in other countries. We will only transfer personal data as allowed by applicable law to further the purposes set out in this document. Where personal data is transferred to another country, we take administrative and technical measures to ensure adequate safeguards and protections are applied as provided for by applicable law. In cases where personal data is transmitted to other countries, we will ensure that safeguards equivalent to those required by applicable data protection laws are in place. For more information on the safeguards implemented by Medtronic, please contact us via
email
.
For more information on Medtronic affiliates (including those affiliates to whom personal data may be transferred) please consult Exhibit 21 of the most recent annual 10-K filing, available at
SEC Filings.
We will only keep your personal data for so long as necessary to fulfill the purposes for which we are allowed to use them, as set out in this privacy notice. Your data may be archived for longer in order to take into account applicable statute of limitation periods, or as otherwise required by law. For more information on the retention of your personal data, contact us as indicated in the “
How to contact us
” section below.
You may have some of the rights below relating to your personal data, depending on applicable laws. Additional information may be found in the specific jurisdictions section.
Access
your personal data and confirm how your personal data is being processed.
Transfer
or
obtain a copy
in a structured, machine-readable, or
portable
format
.
Correct
or amend if it is incomplete, inaccurate, or outdated.
Request
deletion
of your personal data, which in some cases may be fulfilled by restricting, obfuscating, de-linking, or deidentifying that data.
Restrict
or
limit
excessive or unlawful processing, where the accuracy of the data is contested.
Object
to or
opt-out
of processing in circumstances where Medtronic claims a legitimate interest in its processing and where your rights outweigh those of Medtronic, such as where that data is used for direct marketing (including email or telephonic marketing).
Withdraw (or manage) consent
where it is the basis for processing, which may include cases where the data is sensitive or about children. Where consent is revoked, we will not further process that data unless required or otherwise permitted by applicable law.
Exercising your rights
How to exercise your rights.
You or your authorized agent may exercise these rights at any time or contact us with any inquiries through the methods provided in the “
How to contact us
” section below.
Process.
We will first confirm that we have received your request. For rights requests, we are required to verify your identity, your right to access the information requested, and, as applicable, your authorized agent’s authority to act on your behalf. We may need to ask you for additional information that will help us do so, including government-issued IDs containing your name and address, utility bills containing that same information, and/or unique identifiers like usernames. We will only use that additional information in the verification process, and not for any other purpose.
After the validation of identity and authority (including if we do not receive that information), we will process your request and then contact you with our response to your request, including any data and reasons for rejection as applicable, within the time required by applicable law. If we need more time, we will notify you in accordance with applicable law.
Fees.
We may charge a reasonable fee in some geographies to process or respond to your request only if allowed by applicable law, for instance if it is excessive, repetitive, or manifestly unfounded. If a fee is warranted, we will tell you why we made that decision and provide you with a cost estimate before completing your request.
Additional options.
Depending on your jurisdiction, you may have additional options if you are dissatisfied with our response:
You may internally appeal or contact our data protection officer if you disagree with a decision we made about your rights. Please include a copy of or reference to the decision.
You may also complain to a data protection or regulatory authority if you have further concerns about our data practices or our response to a request. If you need information about which authority may apply to you depending on your location and circumstances, please contact us.
You will not be discriminated against for your exercise of your rights. This does not necessarily include, depending on applicable law in your jurisdiction, cases where a difference in price or services offered is reasonably related to the value provided by your data, or where you consent to participate in a voluntary loyalty or similar incentive program.
We do not intentionally collect personal data from children (as defined by applicable law) unless we have received verifiable consent (from the parent or the child, depending on the requirements of applicable law) unless a legal requirement or vital interest applies. If you believe we have collected personal data from a child, contact us using the information found in the “
How to contact us
” section.
United States of America
Past practices.
The statements in this notice are our data processing activities for the described scope of the notice both as current and within the past 12 months.
Protected health information under HIPAA.
This notice does not apply to our data processing activities and practices for Protected Health Information (PHI), which is regulated under the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (HIPAA). In those cases, you may have received a Notice of Privacy Practices from Medtronic or your health care provider which will govern that data use. Data governed under HIPAA may be deidentified through either or both the Safe Harbor and Expert Determination methods. While that data is then deidentified, Medtronic does not, and will not permit others to, reidentify deidentified PHI except as required by applicable law or as directly consented to by the subject of that PHI.
Sales/sharing of personal data:
Medtronic does not sell your personal data for money or other consideration, nor share it for direct or behavioral marketing purposes, with unrelated third parties, except as described in the
cookies and similar technologies
paragraph.
Right to opt-out or object.
As noted above, you may have the right to opt-out of some processing, such as sharing data with third parties for their own or for cross-contextual marketing, sales of personal data, making certain decisions or profiles about you by automated or artificial means, or certain kinds of automated/prerecorded telephonic messages.
Right to restrict or limit.
In some jurisdictions you may have the right to restrict some processing if the data is sensitive and used for purposes additional to delivering requested goods/services.
Exercising your privacy rights.
United States residents can file a privacy rights request by sending an
email
or by calling 1-866-639-6907. You do not have to create an account with us to submit a request.
This privacy notice may be updated periodically to reflect changes in our personal data practices. We will indicate at the top of the privacy notice when it was most recently updated. You can read the
previous version of our privacy notice
here.
If you would like to exercise your privacy rights or if you have any questions about this privacy notice you may contact us as follows:
General inquiries
(all geographies): By
email
.
U.S. inquiries
: By email via the general inquiries email address or phone: 866-639-6907.
You may also send mail to our general-purpose corporate mailing address:
Medtronic, Inc.
710 Medtronic Parkway Northeast,
Fridley, Minnesota 55432-5603,
USA
Back to top
Share
Print
Mail
Link
Facebook
LinkedIn
Close
contactUs
There are items that require your attention.
Call Customer Care
Email Customer Care
There are items that require your attention.
First Name
Last Name
EMAIL
There are items that require your attention.
First Name
Last Name
EMAIL
Hospital Or Organization
Job Role
Select...
Administrator
Application Support Manager
Assistant
Biomedical Engineer
Chief Executive Officer
Chief Financial Officer
Chief Medical Officer
Chief Operating Officer
Chief Technology Officer
Data Protection Officer
Dietician
Director
Educator
Head Nurse
Head of Department
Head Physician
Head Surgeon
Manager
Managing Director
Marketing
Medical Assistant
Medical Director
Network & Infrastructure Manager
Nurse
Perfusionist
Pharmacist
Physician
Physiotherapist
Practice Owner
Professor
Purchaser
Researcher
Security Manager
Stock Controller
Surgeon
Technician
Specialty
Select...
Administration
Anesthesiology
Audiology
Bariatrics
Biomedics
Cardiology
Cardiothoracic Surgery
Colorectal Surgery
Cranio Maxillo Facial
Critical/Intensive Care
Dermatology
Diabetology
Electrophysiology
Endocrinology
ENT Surgery
Functional Diagnostics
Gastroenterology
General Medicine
General Surgery
Geriatrics
Head & Neck Surgery
Hematology
Hemodynamic
Interventional Cardiology
Interventional Radiology
Medical Engineering
Nephrology
Neurology
Neuro Radiology
Neuro Surgery
Obstetrics & Gynecology
Oncology
Ophthalmic Surgery
Orthopaedic Surgery
Otolaryngology
Otology
Pain Management
Pediatrics
Pediatric Surgery
Pharmacy
Phlebology
Physiology
Physiotherapy
Plastic Surgery
Psychiatry
Pulmonology
Purchasing
Radiology
Rehabilitation Medicine
Respiratory Therapy
Rheumatology
Rhinology
Technologist
Trauma Surgery
Upper GI Surgery
Urology
Vascular Surgery
There are items that require your attention.
MESSAGE
There are items that require your attention.
I have read and agree to the
terms and conditions.
Your information will be used  and protected in accordance with our
privacy notice.
There are items that require your attention.
United States
Customer Care Team
Hours: 8:00 a.m. - 8:00 p.m. EST
Phone: 763-514-4000
Toll-free: 800-633-8766
There are items that require your attention.
Access Instruments
Bladder & Bowel
Cardiac Rhythm & Diagnostics
Cardiovascular
Diabetes
Digestive & Gastrointestinal
Ear, Nose & Throat
Gynecological
Hernia Repair
Lung Health & Thoracic Surgery
Neurological
Patient Monitoring
Respiratory
Spinal & Orthopedic
Surgical Energy
Surgical Navigation & Imaging
Surgical Robotics
Surgical Stapling
Wound Closure
There are items that require your attention.
Absorbable Antibacterial Envelopes
Aortic Products
Arteriovenous Fistula (AVF) Creation
Capsule Endoscopy
Cardiac Mapping
Cardiac Monitoring
Cardiac Resynchronization Therapy
Cardiac Rhythm & Diagnostics Software
Cardiac Rhythm & Diagnostics Technologies
Cardiac Rhythm Systems
Cardiovascular Guidewires
Chronic Total Occlusion Devices
Continuous Glucose Monitors
Coronary Balloons
Coronary Catheters
Coronary Stents
Deep Venous Stents
Defibrillator Leads
Diabetes Software
Diagnostic Catheters
Directional Atherectomy Systems
Embolic Protection Devices
Endoscopic Devices
Endoscopic Hemostasis
Endoscopic Resection
Endoscopic Ultrasound
Extracorporeal Membrane Oxygenation
Gastrointestinal Artificial Intelligence
Heart Valves
Implantable Cardioverter Defibrillators
Infusion Therapy
Insulin Pumps
Intraprocedural Monitoring Products
Introducer Sheaths
Introducer Sheaths & Needles
Laparoscopic Access Instruments
Laparoscopic Accessories
Left Atrial Appendage Exclusion Systems
Ligation
Motility Testing
PTA Balloons
Pacing Systems
Peripheral & Biliary Stents
Peripheral Drug-Coated Balloons
Peripheral Embolization
Reflux Testing
Revascularization Products
Sacral Neuromodulation
Smart Insulin Products
Snares
Steerable Sheaths
Suction Irrigation Devices
Superficial Vein Products
Support Catheters
Trocars
Ventricular Assist Devices
Visualization Accessories
Wound Protectors
Access & Dissection
Brain Monitoring
Bronchoscope Adapters
Capnography Monitoring
Continuous Patient Monitoring
Deep Brain Stimulation
Diagnostic Screening Systems
Drug Infusion Systems
Fiducial Markers
Hernia Fixation
Hysteroscopy Systems
Intubation
Navigation Catheters
Nerve Monitoring Equipment
Neurovascular
OEM Monitoring Solutions
Patient Sensors
Porcine Dermal Collagen Implants
Powered Surgical Equipment
Powered Surgical Instruments
Procedure Kits
Pulmonary & Biopsy Tools
Pulse Oximetry
Regional Oximetry
Remote Patient Monitoring
Sinus Implants
Spinal Cord Stimulation
Synthetic Mesh
Temperature Management
Ablation Products
Cervical Spine Solutions
Complex Spine Solutions
Electrosurgical Accessories
Electrosurgical Hardware
Electrosurgical Instruments
Mechanical Ventilation
Respiratory Software
Smoke Evacuation Systems & Accessories
Surgical Sponge Detection Systems
Tracheostomy
Ultrasonic Dissection
Vertebral Augmentation
Vessel Sealing
ENT Navigation Systems
Surgical Imaging Systems
Surgical Navigation Systems
Robotic Systems
Stapler Reloads & Loading Units
Surgical Staplers
Stapling Smart Cart
Endoscopic Suturing
Skin Stapling
Sutures
Topical Skin Adhesives
Wound Closure Accessories
There are items that require your attention.
Confirm country/region
Adriatic
Arabia
Argentina
Australia and New Zealand
Bangladesh
Belgique (Belgium) - Français
België (Belgium) - Nederlands
Brasil (Brazil)
Bulgaria
Canada - English
Canada - Français
Central/Eastern Europe, Middle East & Africa
Chile
Colombia
Costa Rica
Danmark (Denmark)
Deutschland (Germany)
Ecuador
España (Spain)
Europe
France
Indian Subcontinent
Ireland
Israel  ישראל
Italia (Italy)
Latinoamérica
Magyarország (Hungary)
México (Mexico)
Nederland (Netherlands)
Norge (Norway)
Panama
Paraguay
Perú (Peru)
Philippines
Polska (Poland)
Portugal
Puerto Rico
Romania
Schweiz (Switzerland) - Deutsch
Singapore
Slovenská republika (Slovak Republic)
South Africa and Sub-Sahara
Suisse (Switzerland) - Français
Suomi (Finland)
Sverige (Sweden)
Thailand
Türkiye (Turkey)
United Kingdom
United States of America
Uruguay
Vietnam
Österreich (Austria)
Česká republika (Czech Republic)
Ελλάδα (Greece)
Российская Федерация (Russia)
Србија (Serbia)
Україна (Ukraine)
中国 (China)
台灣地區 (Taiwan)
日本 (Japan)
香港特區 (Hong Kong SAR)
대한민국 (South Korea)
Just to confirm, is this the product or product type that interests you?
{{productNamePlaceholder}}
Yes
No
OR
Something else
There are items that require your attention.
Order a product
Product pricing
Product demo
OR
Product manual
Something else
There are items that require your attention.
Confirm country/region
Adriatic
Arabia
Argentina
Australia and New Zealand
Bangladesh
Belgique (Belgium) - Français
België (Belgium) - Nederlands
Brasil (Brazil)
Bulgaria
Canada - English
Canada - Français
Central/Eastern Europe, Middle East & Africa
Chile
Colombia
Costa Rica
Danmark (Denmark)
Deutschland (Germany)
Ecuador
España (Spain)
Europe
France
Indian Subcontinent
Ireland
Israel  ישראל
Italia (Italy)
Latinoamérica
Magyarország (Hungary)
México (Mexico)
Nederland (Netherlands)
Norge (Norway)
Panama
Paraguay
Perú (Peru)
Philippines
Polska (Poland)
Portugal
Puerto Rico
Romania
Schweiz (Switzerland) - Deutsch
Singapore
Slovenská republika (Slovak Republic)
South Africa and Sub-Sahara
Suisse (Switzerland) - Français
Suomi (Finland)
Sverige (Sweden)
Thailand
Türkiye (Turkey)
United Kingdom
United States of America
Uruguay
Vietnam
Österreich (Austria)
Česká republika (Czech Republic)
Ελλάδα (Greece)
Российская Федерация (Russia)
Србија (Serbia)
Україна (Ukraine)
中国 (China)
台灣地區 (Taiwan)
日本 (Japan)
香港特區 (Hong Kong SAR)
대한민국 (South Korea)
Access Instruments
Bladder & Bowel
Cardiac Rhythm & Diagnostics
Cardiovascular
Diabetes
Digestive & Gastrointestinal
Ear, Nose & Throat
Gynecological
Hernia Repair
Lung Health & Thoracic Surgery
Neurological
Patient Monitoring
Respiratory
Spinal & Orthopedic
Surgical Energy
Surgical Navigation & Imaging
Surgical Robotics
Surgical Stapling
Wound Closure
There are items that require your attention.
Ask order question
Order products
OR
Self service
There are items that require your attention.
Go to Connect
Request access
There are items that require your attention.
Confirm country/region
Adriatic
Arabia
Argentina
Australia and New Zealand
Bangladesh
Belgique (Belgium) - Français
België (Belgium) - Nederlands
Brasil (Brazil)
Bulgaria
Canada - English
Canada - Français
Central/Eastern Europe, Middle East & Africa
Chile
Colombia
Costa Rica
Danmark (Denmark)
Deutschland (Germany)
Ecuador
España (Spain)
Europe
France
Indian Subcontinent
Ireland
Israel  ישראל
Italia (Italy)
Latinoamérica
Magyarország (Hungary)
México (Mexico)
Nederland (Netherlands)
Norge (Norway)
Panama
Paraguay
Perú (Peru)
Philippines
Polska (Poland)
Portugal
Puerto Rico
Romania
Schweiz (Switzerland) - Deutsch
Singapore
Slovenská republika (Slovak Republic)
South Africa and Sub-Sahara
Suisse (Switzerland) - Français
Suomi (Finland)
Sverige (Sweden)
Thailand
Türkiye (Turkey)
United Kingdom
United States of America
Uruguay
Vietnam
Österreich (Austria)
Česká republika (Czech Republic)
Ελλάδα (Greece)
Российская Федерация (Russia)
Србија (Serbia)
Україна (Ukraine)
中国 (China)
台灣地區 (Taiwan)
日本 (Japan)
香港特區 (Hong Kong SAR)
대한민국 (South Korea)
Ask order question
Self service
There are items that require your attention.
Product manuals
Reimbursement
MRI safety
Physician collaboration
There are items that require your attention.
Order
Product
Support
Education and training
OR
Something else
There are items that require your attention.
Confirm country/region
Adriatic
Arabia
Argentina
Australia and New Zealand
Bangladesh
Belgique (Belgium) - Français
België (Belgium) - Nederlands
Brasil (Brazil)
Bulgaria
Canada - English
Canada - Français
Central/Eastern Europe, Middle East & Africa
Chile
Colombia
Costa Rica
Danmark (Denmark)
Deutschland (Germany)
Ecuador
España (Spain)
Europe
France
Indian Subcontinent
Ireland
Israel  ישראל
Italia (Italy)
Latinoamérica
Magyarország (Hungary)
México (Mexico)
Nederland (Netherlands)
Norge (Norway)
Panama
Paraguay
Perú (Peru)
Philippines
Polska (Poland)
Portugal
Puerto Rico
Romania
Schweiz (Switzerland) - Deutsch
Singapore
Slovenská republika (Slovak Republic)
South Africa and Sub-Sahara
Suisse (Switzerland) - Français
Suomi (Finland)
Sverige (Sweden)
Thailand
Türkiye (Turkey)
United Kingdom
United States of America
Uruguay
Vietnam
Österreich (Austria)
Česká republika (Czech Republic)
Ελλάδα (Greece)
Российская Федерация (Russia)
Србија (Serbia)
Україна (Ukraine)
中国 (China)
台灣地區 (Taiwan)
日本 (Japan)
香港特區 (Hong Kong SAR)
대한민국 (South Korea)
Before we get started, what best describes you?
Healthcare professional
Patient or caregiver
Supplier
News media
OR
Someone else
There are items that require your attention.
Diabetes
OR
Patient services
Implant safety information
ID card updates
Returns and replacements
OR
Something else
There are items that require your attention.
Confirm country/region
Adriatic
Arabia
Argentina
Australia and New Zealand
Bangladesh
Belgique (Belgium) - Français
België (Belgium) - Nederlands
Brasil (Brazil)
Bulgaria
Canada - English
Canada - Français
Central/Eastern Europe, Middle East & Africa
Chile
Colombia
Costa Rica
Danmark (Denmark)
Deutschland (Germany)
Ecuador
España (Spain)
Europe
France
Indian Subcontinent
Ireland
Israel  ישראל
Italia (Italy)
Latinoamérica
Magyarország (Hungary)
México (Mexico)
Nederland (Netherlands)
Norge (Norway)
Panama
Paraguay
Perú (Peru)
Philippines
Polska (Poland)
Portugal
Puerto Rico
Romania
Schweiz (Switzerland) - Deutsch
Singapore
Slovenská republika (Slovak Republic)
South Africa and Sub-Sahara
Suisse (Switzerland) - Français
Suomi (Finland)
Sverige (Sweden)
Thailand
Türkiye (Turkey)
United Kingdom
United States of America
Uruguay
Vietnam
Österreich (Austria)
Česká republika (Czech Republic)
Ελλάδα (Greece)
Российская Федерация (Russia)
Србија (Serbia)
Україна (Ukraine)
中国 (China)
台灣地區 (Taiwan)
日本 (Japan)
香港特區 (Hong Kong SAR)
대한민국 (South Korea)
Before we get started, what best describes you?
Healthcare professional
Patient or caregiver
OR
Someone else
There are items that require your attention.
Respond by email
Respond by phone
There are items that require your attention.
Message
There are items that require your attention.
First Name
Last Name
EMAIL
Hospital Or Organization
HOSPITAL POSTAL CODE
Job Role
Select...
Administrator
Application Support Manager
Assistant
Biomedical Engineer
Chief Executive Officer
Chief Financial Officer
Chief Medical Officer
Chief Operating Officer
Chief Technology Officer
Data Protection Officer
Dietician
Director
Educator
Head Nurse
Head of Department
Head Physician
Head Surgeon
Manager
Managing Director
Marketing
Medical Assistant
Medical Director
Network & Infrastructure Manager
Nurse
Perfusionist
Pharmacist
Physician
Physiotherapist
Practice Owner
Professor
Purchaser
Researcher
Security Manager
Stock Controller
Surgeon
Technician
Specialty
Select...
Administration
Anesthesiology
Audiology
Bariatrics
Biomedics
Cardiology
Cardiothoracic Surgery
Colorectal Surgery
Cranio Maxillo Facial
Critical/Intensive Care
Dermatology
Diabetology
Electrophysiology
Endocrinology
ENT Surgery
Functional Diagnostics
Gastroenterology
General Medicine
General Surgery
Geriatrics
Head & Neck Surgery
Hematology
Hermodynamic
Interventional Cardiology
Interventional Radiology
Medical Engineering
Nephrology
Neurology
Neuro Radiology
Neuro Surgery
Obstetrics & Gynecology
Oncology
Ophthalmic Surgery
Orthopaedic Surgery
Otolaryngology
Otology
Pain Management
Pediatrics
Pediatric Surgery
Pharmacy
Phlebology
Physiology
Physiotherapy
Plastic Surgery
Psychiatry
Pulmonology
Purchasing
Radiology
Rehabilitation Medicine
Respiratory Therapy
Rheumatology
Rhinology
Technologist
Trauma Surgery
Upper GI Surgery
Urology
Vascular Surgery
There are items that require your attention.
First Name
Last Name
EMAIL
PHONE
Hospital Or Organization
HOSPITAL POSTAL CODE
Job Role
Select...
Administrator
Application Support Manager
Assistant
Biomedical Engineer
Chief Executive Officer
Chief Financial Officer
Chief Medical Officer
Chief Operating Officer
Chief Technology Officer
Data Protection Officer
Dietician
Director
Educator
Head Nurse
Head of Department
Head Physician
Head Surgeon
Manager
Managing Director
Marketing
Medical Assistant
Medical Director
Network & Infrastructure Manager
Nurse
Perfusionist
Pharmacist
Physician
Physiotherapist
Practice Owner
Professor
Purchaser
Researcher
Security Manager
Stock Controller
Surgeon
Technician
Specialty
Select...
Administration
Anesthesiology
Audiology
Bariatrics
Biomedics
Cardiology
Cardiothoracic Surgery
Colorectal Surgery
Cranio Maxillo Facial
Critical/Intensive Care
Dermatology
Diabetology
Electrophysiology
Endocrinology
ENT Surgery
Functional Diagnostics
Gastroenterology
General Medicine
General Surgery
Geriatrics
Head & Neck Surgery
Hematology
Hemodynamic
Interventional Cardiology
Interventional Radiology
Medical Engineering
Nephrology
Neurology
Neuro Radiology
Neuro Surgery
Obstetrics & Gynecology
Oncology
Ophthalmic Surgery
Orthopaedic Surgery
Otolaryngology
Otology
Pain Management
Pediatrics
Pediatric Surgery
Pharmacy
Phlebology
Physiology
Physiotherapy
Plastic Surgery
Psychiatry
Pulmonology
Purchasing
Radiology
Rehabilitation Medicine
Respiratory Therapy
Rheumatology
Rhinology
Technologist
Trauma Surgery
Upper GI Surgery
Urology
Vascular Surgery
There are items that require your attention.
{{productNamePlaceholder}}
New products & technology
New services
Education & training
Clinical information
Customer Experience Surveys
If you subscribe to email updates, you can unsubscribe anytime via the link in each email. We use technology to measure email opens and clicks, to improve our communications and provide relevant content. For details, see our
privacy notice.
There are items that require your attention.
I have read and agree with the
terms and conditions.
Your personal data will be used to manage your relationship with Medtronic in accordance with our
privacy notice.
There are items that require your attention.
Before we get started, what best describes you?
Healthcare professional
Patient or caregiver
Supplier
News media
OR
Someone else
There are items that require your attention.
There are items that require your attention.
There are items that require your attention.
Yes
No
There are items that require your attention.
Yes
No
There are items that require your attention.
First Name
EMAIL
There are items that require your attention.
Product & technology information
Education & clinical information
Customer experience surveys
If you consent to receive emails, you can unsubscribe anytime via the link in each email.  We use technology that measures email opens and clicks, to improve our communications and provide relevant content.  For details, see our
privacy notice.
About cookies
We use necessary and audience measurement cookies to make this site work and produce anonymous statistics. We'd also like to set cookies and similar technologies to improve the functionality of the site, further analyze visitors' activity, and show personalized ads. These will be set only if you accept them. You can change your mind at any time by clicking on the "Cookie" icon at the bottom left of each page.  To learn more on the cookies we use and the third parties that are setting cookies on our site, click “Cookie preferences”.
Cookie preferences
Reject all
Accept all
Cookie preference center
When you visit our website, we store cookies on your browser to collect information. The information collected might relate to you, your preferences or your device, and is mostly used to make the site work as you expect it to and to provide a more personalized web experience. However, you can choose not to allow certain types of cookies, which may impact your experience of the site and the services we are able to offer. Click on the different category headings to find out more and change our default settings according to your preference. You cannot opt-out of our Necessary Cookies as they are deployed in order to ensure the proper functioning of our website (such as prompting the cookie banner and remembering your settings, to log into your account, to redirect you when you log out, etc.). For more information about the First and Third Party Cookies used, please follow this link:
Cookie Policy
Allow all
Cookie preferences
Always active
These cookies are necessary for the site to function and cannot be switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as setting your privacy or language preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You may disable these by changing your browser settings, but this may affect how the website functions.
View Vendor Details‎
Technical Analytics Cookies (Audience Measurement)
These cookies are necessary for the day-to-day operation of the site. They are set and used only by us to produce anonymized statistics about the use of the site to ensure it is performing correctly. You may disable them at any time by changing your cookie preferences in this tool.
View Vendor Details‎
Non-Technical Analytics Cookies
These cookies allow us to further analyze visitors' activity on our site so we can measure and improve the effectiveness of our online services. They may be set by us or by third-party analytics service providers.  If you don't allow these cookies, we will not be able to monitor the effectiveness of our services.
Analytics Cookies
Switch Label
label
These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around the site. If you do not allow these cookies we will not know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor its performance.
View Vendor Details‎
Functionality Cookies
These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality  such as video content. They may be set by us or by third party providers whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
View Vendor Details‎
Advertising Cookies
These cookies may be set through our site by us or our advertising partners. They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your interests and show you personalised ads on other sites based on your browsing history and profile.    They do not store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely identifying your browser and internet device. These cookies may also include a range of social media services that we have added to the site to enable you to share our content with your friends and networks. They are capable of tracking your browser across other sites and building up a profile of your interests. This may impact the content and messages you see on other websites you visit.
View Vendor Details‎
Back Button
Vendors List
Search Icon
Filter Icon
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label